Utah statutes.
78B-5-102.   Jury to decide questions of fact.
All questions of fact, where the trial is by jury, other than those mentioned
in Section 78B-5-103, are to be decided by the jury, and all evidence is to be
addressed to them, except when otherwise provided.
